apertium-sme-fin.fin.lexc
LEXICON exceptional_10_NOUN/stemfiller
0:ika	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:ja	NounStem/Singular/Weak	;
0:ika	NounStem/Singular/Strong	;
0:j	NounStem/Plural/Weak	;
0:k	NounStem/Plural/Strong	;
0:ika	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA	;
0:ika	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:ika	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIN	;
0:ik	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:ik	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:ik	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;

LEXICON exceptional_24_NOUN/stemfiller
0:i	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:e	NounStem/Singular	;
0:{^a}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON exceptional_26_NOUN/stemfiller
0:i	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:e	NounStem/Singular	;
0:{^a}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;



LEXICON kotus_5_NUMERAL/stemfiller
	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:i	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA	;
0:i	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:i	NounStem/Singular	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/PartitiveJA	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:e	NounStem/Plural	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;

LEXICON kotus_5i_NUMERAL/stemfiller
0:i	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:i	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA	;
0:i	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:i	NounStem/Singular	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/PartitiveJA	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:e	NounStem/Plural	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;

LEXICON kotus_8_NUMERAL/stemfiller
	NounStem/Nominative	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA	;
	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveJA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveJEN	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_9_NUMERAL/stemfiller
0:{aä}	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIN	;
0:{aä}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveJA	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveJEN	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:{oö}	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_10_NUMERAL/stemfiller
0:{aä}	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIN	;
0:{aä}	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_10n_NUMERAL/stemfiller
0:{aä}n	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIN	;
0:{aä}	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_27_NUMERAL/stemfiller
0:si	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{t~~}e{F}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{t~~}e{F}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:t	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:t	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:s	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_31_NUMERAL/stemfiller
0:ksi	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:h{t~~}e{F}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:h{t~~}e{F}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:h	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:ks	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:ks	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:ks	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:ks	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_32_NUMERAL/stemfiller
0:{AV-}en	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{AV+}e	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{AV+}e	NounStem/Singular	;
0:{AV-}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:{AV-}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
0:{AV+}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:{AV+}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:{AV+}	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:{AV+}	NounStem/Plural	;


LEXICON kotus_38_NUMERAL/stemfiller
0:nen	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:se	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:se	NounStem/Singular	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:s	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:s	NounStem/Plural	;
[COMPOUND_FORM=S]:s	Compounding		;

LEXICON kotus_45_NUMERAL/stemfiller
0:s	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:n{t~~}e{J}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:n{t~~}e{J}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:t	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:ns	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:ns	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:ns	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:ns	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_46_NUMERAL/stemfiller
0:t	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:n{t~~}e{J}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:n{t~~}e{J}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:t	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
0:n	NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN	;
0:ns	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
0:ns	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
0:ns	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
0:ns	NounStem/Plural	;



LEXICON kotus_1_PROPER_first/stemfiller
	kotus_1_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_1_PROPER_last/stemfiller
	kotus_1_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_1_PROPER_geo/stemfiller
	kotus_1_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_1_PROPER_misc/stemfiller
	kotus_1_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_2_PROPER_first/stemfiller
	kotus_2_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_2_PROPER_last/stemfiller
	kotus_2_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_2_PROPER_geo/stemfiller
	kotus_2_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_2_PROPER_misc/stemfiller
	kotus_2_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_3_PROPER_first/stemfiller
	kotus_3_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_3_PROPER_last/stemfiller
	kotus_3_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_3_PROPER_geo/stemfiller
	kotus_3_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_3_PROPER_misc/stemfiller
	kotus_3_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_4_PROPER_first/stemfiller
	kotus_4_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_4_PROPER_last/stemfiller
	kotus_4_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_4_PROPER_geo/stemfiller
	kotus_4_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_5_PROPER_first/stemfiller
	kotus_5_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_5_PROPER_last/stemfiller
	kotus_5_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_5_PROPER_geo/stemfiller
	kotus_5_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_5_PROPER_misc/stemfiller
	kotus_5_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_5i_PROPER_first/stemfiller
	kotus_5i_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_5i_PROPER_last/stemfiller
	kotus_5i_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_5i_PROPER_geo/stemfiller
	kotus_5i_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_5i_PROPER_misc/stemfiller
	kotus_5i_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_6_PROPER_first/stemfiller
	kotus_6_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_6_PROPER_last/stemfiller
	kotus_6_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_6_PROPER_geo/stemfiller
	kotus_6_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_6_PROPER_misc/stemfiller
	kotus_6_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_6i_PROPER_first/stemfiller
	kotus_6i_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_6i_PROPER_last/stemfiller
	kotus_6i_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_6i_PROPER_geo/stemfiller
	kotus_6i_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_6i_PROPER_misc/stemfiller
	kotus_6i_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_7_PROPER_first/stemfiller
	kotus_7_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_7_PROPER_last/stemfiller
	kotus_7_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller
	kotus_7_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_8_PROPER_first/stemfiller
	kotus_8_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_8_PROPER_last/stemfiller
	kotus_8_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_8_PROPER_geo/stemfiller
	kotus_8_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_8_PROPER_misc/stemfiller
	kotus_8_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_9_PROPER_first/stemfiller
	kotus_9_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_9_PROPER_last/stemfiller
	kotus_9_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_9_PROPER_geo/stemfiller
	kotus_9_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_9_PROPER_misc/stemfiller
	kotus_9_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_10_PROPER_first/stemfiller
	kotus_10_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_10_PROPER_last/stemfiller
	kotus_10_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_10_PROPER_geo/stemfiller
	kotus_10_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_10_PROPER_misc/stemfiller
	kotus_10_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_11_PROPER_first/stemfiller
	kotus_11_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_11_PROPER_last/stemfiller
	kotus_11_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_11_PROPER_geo/stemfiller
	kotus_11_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_11_PROPER_misc/stemfiller
	kotus_11_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_7_PROPER/stub
Aksujärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:aksujärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Iijärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:Iijärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Iijärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:iijärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Inarijärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:Inarijärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Inarijärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:inarijärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Kemijärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:Kemijärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Kemijärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:kemijärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Kilpisjärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:Kilpisjärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Kilpisjärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:kilpisjärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Kivijärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:Kivijärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Kivijärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:kivijärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Mantojärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:Mantojärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Mantojärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:mantojärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Menesjärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:Menesjärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Menesjärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:menesjärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Mierasjärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:Mierasjärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Mierasjärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:mierasjärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Nitsijärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:Nitsijärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Nitsijärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:nitsijärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Outakoski'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:Outakosk	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Outakoski'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:outakosk	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Peltojärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:Peltojärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Peltojärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:peltojärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Pyhäjärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:Pyhäjärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Pyhäjärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:pyhäjärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Savukoski'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:Savukosk	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Savukoski'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:savukosk	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Sevettijärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:Sevettijärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Sevettijärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:sevettijärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Suomi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:Suom	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Suomi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:suom	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Syysjärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:Syysjärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Syysjärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:syysjärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Vetsijärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:Vetsijärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Vuontisjärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:Vuontisjärv	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Palojärvi'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7]:Palojärv	kotus_7_PROPER_last/stemfiller	;
Inarijoki'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7][KAV=D]:Inarijo{k~~}{D}	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Kaamasjoki'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7][KAV=D]:Kaamasjo{k~~}{D}	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Kemijoki'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7][KAV=D]:Kemijo{k~~}{D}	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Kevojoki'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7][KAV=D]:Kevojo{k~~}{D}	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Lemmenjoki'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7][KAV=D]:Lemmenjo{k~~}{D}	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Ounasjoki'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7][KAV=D]:Ounasjo{k~~}{D}	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Paatsjoki'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7][KAV=D]:Paatsjo{k~~}{D}	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Utsjoki'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7][KAV=D]:Utsjo{k~~}{D}	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
Vaskojoki'][POS=NOUN][SUBCAT=PROPER][KTN=7][KAV=D]:Vaskojo{k~~}{D}	kotus_7_PROPER_geo/stemfiller	;
